Washington statutes.
RCW 36.86.080

Application of design standards to construction and reconstruction.

Upon the adoption of uniform design standards the legislative authority of each county shall apply the same to all new construction within, and as far as practicable and feasible to reconstruction of old roads comprising, the county primary road system. No deviation from such design standards as to such primary system may be made without the approval of the state aid engineer for the department of transportation.

[ 1982 c 145 s 3; 1963 c 4 s 36.86.080. Prior: 1949 c 165 s 4; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 6450-8k.]